Utah statutes.
48-3a-301.   No agency powers of member as member.

(1)  A member is not an agent of a limited liability company solely by reason of being a member.

(2)  A person's status as a member does not prevent or restrict law other than this chapter from imposing liability on a limited liability company because of the person's conduct.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

